District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.60

Subsequent appointments.

No person holding a position in the Executive Service may be appointed to a position in the Career, Educational, or Management Supervisory Service for at least one year immediately following his or her separation from the Executive Service, except that, upon termination, a person with Career, Educational, or Management Supervisory Service status may retreat, at the discretion of the Mayor, within 3 months to a vacant position in the service for which he or she is qualified.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1060
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-611.60.
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.